Massachusetts, session 194th, S1795.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 26 of Chapter 31 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is
hereby amended by striking out in line 7 "(4) all others," and inserting the words " (4) member
of the Massachusetts National Guard or Reserves of the United States Armed Forces with no less
than two years of continuous service; (5) all others,"
of 1